Utah statutes.
30-4-4.   Restraining disposal of property.

At the time of filing the complaint mentioned in Section 30-4-1, or at any time subsequent thereto, the plaintiff may procure from the court, and file with the county recorder of any county in the state in which the defendant may own real estate, an order enjoining and restraining the defendant from disposing of or encumbering the same or any portion thereof, describing such real estate with reasonable certainty, and from the time of filing such order the property described therein shall be charged with a lien in favor of the plaintiff to the extent of any judgment which may be rendered in the action.

